Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2174.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 46.61 RCW to read as follows:(1)(a) The legislative body of a county, city, or town, or the secretary of the department of transportation may create a crash prevention zone within its jurisdiction by identifying public roads where there have been a multitude of collisions that have caused serious injuries or fatalities to provide time for authorities to investigate and implement safety improvements in the designated areas. A county, with the approval of a city or town, may designate a crash prevention zone that includes public roads within the county and city or town. A county, city, or town may designate a crash prevention zone that includes roadways managed by the department of transportation with the approval of the department of transportation. The department of transportation may designate a crash prevention zone on a state highway without the approval of a county, city, or town.(b) Prior to the final establishment of a crash prevention zone, the department of transportation, county, city, or town must hold a public hearing where members of the public may view and comment on a map of the designated crash prevention zone.(2) Once a crash prevention zone has been designated, the jurisdiction that established the zone or the department of transportation must conduct an engineering and traffic investigation of the public roads in the zone to identify safety improvements, including adjustments to the speed limits.(3) The Washington state patrol and local law enforcement agencies must coordinate increased enforcement of traffic laws within the crash prevention zone in a manner intended to reduce accidents in the crash prevention zone.(4)(a) A person found to have committed any traffic infraction relating to speed restrictions in a crash prevention zone or infraction with a vehicle collision in a crash prevention zone shall be assessed a monetary penalty of $73, so long as signs stating that penalties are increased are posted notifying drivers of the increased penalties on the particular roadway in the crash prevention zone where the traffic infraction occurred.(b) $73 of the monetary penalties for traffic infractions related to speed restrictions or infractions with a vehicle collision issued within the crash prevention zone must be deposited into an account created for the crash prevention zone that may be used to pay for the engineering and traffic investigation, creation and installation of road signs, safety improvements, and increased law enforcement presence in the crash prevention zone. This account must be administered and maintained by the jurisdiction in which the infraction occurred.(5) The crash prevention zone must be dissolved once safety improvements have been implemented. Furthermore, the crash prevention zone may be dissolved at the discretion of the city, county, or department of transportation that created the zone, at the recommendation of the department of transportation to a city or county, or by a petition of 10 percent of the property owners, residents, or business owners with property that abuts or is within the crash prevention zone that is presented to the city, county, or department of transportation that created the zone.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 35.77 RCW to read as follows:Cities and towns are authorized to establish crash prevention zones in accordance with section 1 of this act.Sec. 3. RCW 36.89.030 and 1984 c 7 s 42 are each amended to read as follows:Counties are authorized to establish, acquire, develop, construct, and improve open space, park, recreation, and community facilities, public health and safety facilities, stormwater control facilities, and highways or any of them pursuant to the provisions of this chapter within and without the cities and towns of the county and for such purposes have the power to acquire lands, buildings and other facilities by gift, grant, purchase, condemnation, lease, devise, and bequest, to construct, improve, or maintain buildings, structures, and facilities necessary for such purposes, and to use and develop for such purposes the air rights over and the subsurface rights under any highway. The approval of the state department of transportation shall be first secured for such use and development of any state highway. For visual or sound buffer purposes the county shall not acquire by condemnation less than an owner's entire interest or right in the particular real property to be so acquired if the owner objects to the taking of a lesser interest or right. Counties are authorized to establish crash prevention zones in accordance with section 1 of this act.--- END ---